Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-5805
Report.

(1) On or before July 1, 2025, and on or before July 1 of each odd-numbered year thereafter, each city shall electronically submit a report to the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature detailing its efforts to eliminate poverty. The report shall encompass the following key components:

(a) Needs Assessment. Conducting a comprehensive needs assessment to identify challenges in housing, education, health care, employment, access to capital, economic development, and social services in target areas;

(b) Community Engagement. Involving residents, community organizations, and stakeholders in the planning process to ensure community input;

(c) Data Analysis. Utilizing data and research to understand root causes of poverty and measure the impact of interventions;

(d) Education and Job Training. Developing accessible education and job training programs in sectors with growth potential;

(e) Affordable Housing. Implementing strategies to increase affordable housing options, address homelessness, and promote home ownership;

(f) Health Care Access. Improving access to quality health care services, including mental health and substance abuse treatment;

(g) Economic Development. Attracting investments to stimulate local business growth and job creation;

(h) Transportation and Infrastructure. Investing in transportation options and infrastructure improvements;

(i) Social Services. Expanding access to social services such as child care, food assistance, and counseling;

(j) Equity and Inclusion. Promoting equity and inclusivity, and addressing disparities based on race, gender, and other factors;

(k) Accountability and Evaluation. Establishing metrics for progress tracking and regular evaluations;

(l) Funding and Resources. Securing funding from various sources, including government grants and private investments;

(m) Long-Term Sustainability. Developing a long-term sustainability plan to maintain improvements;

(n) Coordination and Collaboration. Fostering coordination and collaboration among government agencies, nonprofit organizations, and businesses; and

(o) Public Awareness. Promoting awareness of the city's efforts, goals, and progress through communication and outreach efforts.

(2) The Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature may request any city to present its report to the committee at a public hearing.

Laws 2024, LB840, § 5.